California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(f) A discussion of the extent to which the metrics described for the domain are proving to be useful in understanding the effectiveness of the activities undertaken in the domain.

(g) An analysis of changes in cost per capita.

(h) A descriptive analysis of program integrity challenges generated by the domain and how those challenges have been, or will be, addressed.

(i) A descriptive analysis of the overall effectiveness of the activities in the domain in meeting the intended goals of the domain, any lessons learned, and any recommended adjustments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 613, Sec. 3.   (AB 2207)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.73.

In connection with the evaluation of the DTI required by Section 14184.71, the department’s report of data and quality measures submitted to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and made publicly available pursuant to the Special Terms and Conditions for the Caries Risk Assessment (CRA) and Disease Management Pilot domain shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) A detailed description of how the department has operationalized the domain, including information identifying which entities have responsibility for the components of the domain.

(b) The number of individual incentives paid and the total amount expended, by
 county, under the domain in the current demonstration year.

(c) A descriptive assessment of the impact of the domain on targeted children in the age ranges of under one year of age, one through two years of age, three through four years of age, and five through six years of age, for all of the following:

(1) Provision of CRAs.

(2) Provision of dental exams.

(3) Use of, and expenditures on, preventive dental services.

(4) Use of, and expenditures on, dental treatment services.

(5) Use of, and expenditures on, dental-related general anesthesia, including facility costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 613, Sec. 4.   (AB 2207)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.74.

In connection with the evaluation of the DTI required by Section 14184.71, the department’s report of data and quality measures submitted to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and made publicly available pursuant to the Special Terms and Conditions for the Increase Continuity of Care domain shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) A detailed description of how the department has operationalized the domain, including information identifying which entities have responsibility for the components of the domain.

(b) The number of individual incentives paid and the total amount expended, by county, under the domain in the
 current demonstration year.

(c) A descriptive assessment of the impact of the domain, with respect to targeted children, of all of the following:

(1) Provision of dental exams.

(2) Use of, and expenditures on, preventive dental services.

(3) Use of, and expenditures on, other nonpreventive dental services.

(d) A discussion of the extent to which the metrics prescribed for the domain are proving to be useful in understanding the effectiveness of the activities undertaken in the domain.

(e) An analysis of change in cost per capita.

(f) A descriptive analysis of
 program integrity challenges generated by the domain and how those challenges have been, or will be, addressed.

(g) A descriptive analysis of the overall effectiveness of the activities in the domain in meeting the intended goals of the domain, any lessons learned, and any recommended adjustments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 613, Sec. 5.   (AB 2207)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.75.

In connection with the evaluation of the DTI required by Section 14184.71, the department’s report of data and quality measures submitted to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and made publicly available pursuant to the Special Terms and Conditions for the Local Dental Pilot Program domain shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) A detailed description of how the department has operationalized this aspect of the demonstration project, including the solicitation and selection process.

(b) The number of pilot projects funded and the total amount expended, by project, under the domain in the current demonstration
 year.

(c) A description of the pilot projects selected for award that for each project shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Specific strategies for the project.

(2) Target populations.

(3) Payment methodologies.

(4) Annual budget for the project.

(5) Expected duration of the project.

(6) Performance metrics by which the project shall be measured.

(7) The intended goal of the project.

(d) An assessment of the
 pilot projects selected for award that includes for each project all of the following:

(1) Project performance and outcomes.

(2) Project replicability.

(3) Challenges encountered and actions undertaken to address those challenges.

(4) Information on payments made by the department to the project.

(e) A descriptive assessment of the impact of the Local Dental Pilot Program domain on achieving the goals of the Increase Preventive Services Utilization for Children, Caries Risk Assessment and Disease Management Pilot, and Increase Continuity of Care domains.

(f) A descriptive analysis of program integrity challenges generated by
 the domain and how those challenges have been, or will be, addressed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 613, Sec. 6.   (AB 2207)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.80.

(a) Within 90 days of the effective date of the act that added this section, the department shall amend its contract with the external quality review organization (EQRO) currently under contract with the department and approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to complete an access assessment. This one-time assessment is intended to do all of the following:

(1) Evaluate primary, core specialty, and facility access to care for managed care beneficiaries based on the current health plan network adequacy requirements set forth in the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code) and Medicaid managed care contracts, as applicable.

(2) Consider State Fair Hearing and Independent Medical Review (IMR) decisions, and grievances and appeals or complaints data.

(3) Report on the number of providers accepting new beneficiaries.

(b) The department shall submit to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for approval the access assessment design no later than 180 days after approval by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the EQRO contract amendment.

(c) The department shall establish an advisory committee that will provide input into the structure of the access assessment. The EQRO shall work with the department to establish the advisory committee, which will provide input into the assessment structure, including network adequacy requirements and metrics,
 that should be considered.

(d) The advisory committee shall include one or more representatives of each of the following stakeholders to ensure diverse and robust input into the assessment structure and feedback on the initial draft access assessment report:

(1) Consumer advocacy organizations.

(2) Provider associations.

(3) Health plans and health plan associations.

(4) Legislative staff.

(e) The advisory committee shall do all of the following:

(1) Begin to convene within 60 days of approval by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the EQRO
 contract amendment.

(2) Participate in a minimum of two meetings, including an entrance and exit event, with all events and meetings open to the public.

(3) Provide all of the following:

(A) Feedback on the access assessment structure.

(B) An initial draft access assessment report.

(C) Recommendations that shall be made available on the department’s Internet Web site.

(f) The EQRO shall produce and publish an initial draft and a final access assessment report that includes a comparison of health plan network adequacy compliance across different lines of business. The report shall include recommendations in response to any
 systemic network adequacy issues, if identified. The initial draft and final report shall describe the state’s current compliance with the access and network adequacy standards set forth in the Medicaid Managed Care proposed rule (80 FR 31097) or the finalized Part 438 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, if published before submission of the assessment design to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(g) The access assessment shall do all of the following:

(1) Measure health plan compliance with network adequacy requirements as set forth in the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code) and Medicaid managed care contracts, as applicable. The assessment shall consider State Fair Hearing and IMR decisions, and grievances and appeals or complaints data, and any
 other factors as selected with input from the advisory committee.

(2) Review encounter data, including a review of data from subcapitated plans.

(3) Measure health plan compliance with timely access requirements, as set forth in the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code) and Medicaid managed care contracts using a sample of provider-level data on the soonest appointment availability.

(4) Review compliance with network adequacy requirements for managed care plans, and other lines of business for primary and core specialty care areas and facility access, as set forth in the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code) and Medicaid
 managed care contracts, as applicable, across the entire health plan network.

(5) Applicable network adequacy requirements of the proposed or final Notice of Proposed Rulemaking, as determined under the approved access assessment design, that are not already required under the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code) shall be reviewed and reported on against a metric range as identified by the department and approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services in the access assessment design.

(6) Determine health plan compliance with network adequacy through reviewing information or data from a one-year period using validated network data and utilize it for the time period following conclusion of the preassessment stakeholder process but no sooner than the second half of
 the 2016 calendar year in order to ensure use of the highest quality data source available.

(7) Measure managed care plan compliance with network adequacy requirements within the department and managed care plan contract service areas using the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code) and network adequacy standards within Medicaid managed care contracts, accounting for each of the following:

(A) Geographic differences, including provider shortages at the local, state, and national levels, as applicable.

(B) Previously approved alternate network access standards, as provided for under the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code)
 and Medicaid managed care contracts.

(C) Access to in-network providers and out-of-network providers separately, presented and evaluated separately, when determining overall access to care.

(D) The entire network of providers available to beneficiaries at the state contractor plan level.

(E) Other modalities used for accessing care, including telemedicine.

(h) The department shall post the initial draft report for a 30-day public comment period after it has incorporated the feedback from the advisory committee. The initial draft report shall be posted for public comment no later than 10 months after the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services approves the assessment design.

(i) The department shall also make publicly available the feedback from the advisory committee at the same time it posts the initial draft of the report.

(j) The department shall submit the final access assessment report to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services no later than 90 days after the initial draft report is posted for public comment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 288.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.90.

(a) Subject to appropriation by the Legislature, beginning no sooner than July 1, 2019, and consistent with Section 14184.20, the department may authorize a dental integration pilot program in San Mateo County as a component of the Medi-Cal 2020 demonstration project established by this article, or any extension or amendment to the Medi-Cal 2020 demonstration project pursuant to subdivision (j) of Section 14184.20. The pilot program shall be designed to test the impact to oral care access, quality, and utilization, as well as medical cost impacts by the delivery of covered dental care services as a managed care benefit under the operation of the Health Plan of San Mateo.

(b) Before the start date of the approved pilot program, the department
 shall do all of the following:

(1) Seek input from affected stakeholders including, but not limited to, the Health Plan of San Mateo, currently enrolled Medi-Cal dental providers, other dental providers, and consumer advocates.

(2) Establish objectives for improving dental utilization through the pilot program.

(3) Establish objectives for improving access to oral health care through the pilot program.

(4) Determine that the Health Plan of San Mateo meets the department’s readiness requirements, including, but not limited to, the demonstration of an adequate network of dental care providers.

(c) Under the approved pilot program, covered Medi-Cal dental care services currently provided
 under the Medi-Cal fee-for-service system to enrollees of the Health Plan of San Mateo shall be made the responsibility of the Health Plan of San Mateo, including covered dental care services provided through safety net clinics, such as federally qualified health centers. For the duration of the approved pilot program, enrollees of the Health Plan of San Mateo will no longer receive covered Medi-Cal dental care services through the Medi-Cal fee-for-service system.

(d) To minimize interruptions in ongoing dental care, enrollees impacted by the approved pilot program who have been in treatment with a specific Medi-Cal dental provider for more than 12 months shall be permitted to continue to receive covered dental services from that provider, if all of the following are met:

(1) The provider is willing to continue to treat the enrollee at existing Medi-Cal fee-for-service rates, or
 at another rate or rate methodology as agreed upon by the plan and provider.

(2) The provider remains an eligible provider of dental services in Medi-Cal.

(3) The Health Plan of San Mateo has not identified a significant quality issue with the provider.

(e) The pilot program described in this section shall be authorized for no more than a period of six years.

(f) Pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 14184.20, and to the extent the department obtains federal approval for the pilot program described in this section, the department shall contract with an external entity to conduct an evaluation of the pilot program to be completed and published no later than December 31 of the sixth state fiscal year the pilot program is in operation. The evaluation
 shall include all of the following:

(1) Assessment of the pilot program’s ability to meet the utilization objectives established in this section.

(2) Assessment of the pilot program’s ability to meet the improved access objectives established in this section.

(3) Assessment of overall dental utilization and changes in utilization compared to utilization in the fee-for-service system that occurred prior to the pilot program.

(4) Assessment of the medical cost impacts of the pilot program, if any, such as reductions in emergency room visits.

(5) Assessment of the impacts to the available provider network for dental services in the pilot program compared to the provider network available in
 the fee-for-service system before the pilot program.

(g) The funding for the evaluation described in subdivision (f) shall be provided by the Health Plan of San Mateo to the department. The department shall seek federal matching funds if available.

(h) The department shall consult with the Health Plan of San Mateo no later than six months before the start date of the approved pilot program regarding any necessary adjustments to its capitation rates developed pursuant to Section 14301.1 and methods required to integrate dental care services for plan enrollees.

(i) (1) This section shall not be implemented until all necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(2) This section shall be implemented only to the extent the department
 determines federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 47, Sec. 3.   (SB 849)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.51. California Advancing and Innovating Medi-Cal Act [14184.100. - 14184.900.]

14184.100.

(a) This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Advancing and Innovating Medi-Cal (CalAIM) Act.

(b) The implementation of CalAIM, as set forth in this article and the CalAIM Terms and Conditions, shall support all of the following goals:

(1) Identify and manage the risk and needs of Medi-Cal beneficiaries through whole-person-care approaches and addressing social determinants of health.

(2) Transition and transform the Medi-Cal program to a more consistent and seamless system by reducing complexity and increasing
 flexibility.

(3) Improve quality outcomes, reduce health disparities, and drive delivery system transformation and innovation through value-based initiatives, modernization of systems, and payment reform.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 402.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.101.

For purposes of this article, and elsewhere in law where specified, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “CalAIM” or “CalAIM initiative” means the respective components of the California Advancing and Innovating Medi-Cal initiative authorized by this article and approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services in the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(b) “CalAIM term” means the entire period during which an applicable component of the CalAIM initiative is in effect, as approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, including any applicable extension period.

(c) “CalAIM Terms and Conditions” means those terms and
 conditions issued and approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, including any attachments, appendices, or similar documents, and subsequent amendments thereto, that govern implementation of the respective components of the CalAIM initiative pursuant to this article. CalAIM Terms and Conditions shall include, at a minimum, any terms and conditions specified in the following:

(1) California Advancing and Innovating Medi-Cal Demonstration, Number 11-W-00193/9, as approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services pursuant to Section 1315 of Title 42 of the United States Code, effective for the period from January 1, 2022, to December 31, 2031, inclusive, and any applicable extension period, or for any period
 otherwise approved therein.

(2) Any associated Medicaid Waivers as approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services pursuant to Section 1396n of Title 42 of the United States Code that are necessary to implement a CalAIM component, effective for the period from January 1, 2022, to December 31, 2031, inclusive, and any applicable extension period, or for any period otherwise specified in the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(3) Any associated Medi-Cal State Plan amendments approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that are necessary to implement a CalAIM component.

(4) Any provision of
 a comprehensive risk contract, nonrisk contract, or other similar managed care arrangement, including an intergovernmental agreement, approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to implement the authorities described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3).

(d) “CalAIM year” or “Initiative Year” means the applicable effective period identified in the CalAIM Terms and Conditions that corresponds to a specific period of time as set forth in paragraphs (1) to (10), inclusive. Individual programs or components under the CalAIM Initiative may be operated on program years that differ from the CalAIM years identified in paragraphs (1) to
 (10), inclusive, or may be operated without regard to program years, as applicable.

(1) Initiative year 1 corresponds to the period of January 1, 2022, to December 31, 2022, inclusive.

(2) Initiative year 2 corresponds to the period of January 1, 2023, to December 31, 2023, inclusive.

(3) Initiative year 3 corresponds to the period of January 1, 2024, to December 31, 2024, inclusive.

(4) Initiative year 4 corresponds to the period of January 1, 2025, to December 31, 2025, inclusive.

(5) Initiative year 5 corresponds to the period of January 1, 2026, to December 31, 2026, inclusive.

(6) Initiative year 6 corresponds to the period of January 1, 2027, to December 31, 2027, inclusive.

(7) Initiative year 7 corresponds to the period of January 1, 2028, to December 31, 2028, inclusive.

(8) Initiative year 8 corresponds to the period of January 1, 2029, to December 31, 2029, inclusive.

(9) Initiative year 9 corresponds to the period of January 1, 2030, to December 31, 2030, inclusive.

(10) Initiative year 10 corresponds to the period of January 1, 2031, to December 31, 2031, inclusive.

(e) “Comprehensive risk contract” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 438.2 of Title 42 of the
 Code of Federal Regulations.

(f) “Designated public hospital” means any one of the hospitals identified in subdivision (f) of Section 14184.10, and any successor, including any restructured, reorganized, or differently named hospital, that is operated by a county, a city and county, the University of California, or a special hospital authority described in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 101850) or Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 101852) of Part 4 of Division 101 of the Health and Safety Code, or any additional public hospital to the extent identified as a “designated public hospital” in the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(g) “Federal disproportionate share hospital allotment” means the amount specified for California under Section 1396r-4(f) of Title 42 of the United States Code for a federal fiscal year.

(h) “Federal medical assistance percentage” means the federal medical assistance percentage applicable for federal financial participation purposes for medical assistance under the Medi-Cal State Plan pursuant to Section 1396b(a)(1) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(i) “Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system” means an entity or local agency that contracts with the department to provide covered behavioral health Medi-Cal benefits pursuant to Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 14124.20), or Section 14184.400 and Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 14700), or a county Drug Medi-Cal Organized Delivery System pilot authorized under the CalAIM Terms and Conditions and described in Section 14184.401 or authorized under the Medi-Cal 2020 Demonstration Project Act pursuant to Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 14184).

(j) “Medi-Cal managed care plan” means any
 individual, organization, or entity that enters into a comprehensive risk contract with the department to provide covered full-scope health care services to enrolled Medi-Cal beneficiaries pursuant to any provision of this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200).

(k) “Nonrisk contract” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 438.2 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(l) “Nonfederal share percentage” means the difference between 100 percent and the applicable federal medical assistance percentage.

(m) “Total computable disproportionate share hospital allotment” means the federal disproportionate share hospital allotment for a federal fiscal year, divided by the applicable federal medical assistance percentage with respect to that same federal fiscal
 year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 88.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.102.

(a) Consistent with federal law, the department shall seek federal approval for, and implement, the CalAIM initiative, including, but not limited to, all of the following components:

(1) Continuation of the Medi-Cal Managed Care program, described in part in Sections 14184.200 to 14184.208, inclusive, and, elsewhere in this chapter and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), and which includes any comprehensive risk contract between the department and an individual, organization, or entity to provide covered full-scope health care services to enrolled Medi-Cal beneficiaries pursuant to any provision of this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200).

(2) Continuation of the Global
 Payment Program, described in Section 14184.40, as amended by the act that added this section, and Section 14184.300.

(3) Continuation of the Medi-Cal Specialty Mental Health Services Program, as described in part in Section 14184.400.

(4) Continuation of the Drug Medi-Cal organized delivery system program, as described in part in Section 14184.401.

(5) Behavioral Health Medical Necessity Changes, Payment Reform, Administrative Simplification, and Behavioral Health Quality Improvement Program, as described in Sections 14184.402, 14184.403, 14184.404, and 14184.405.

(6) The State Plan Dental Improvement Program, as described in Section 14184.500.

(7) Enhancing County Oversight and
 Monitoring, as described in Section 14184.600.

(8) Providing Access and Transforming Health (PATH) Supports, as described in Section 14184.700.

(9) Targeted Pre-Release Medi-Cal Benefits for Qualified Inmates, as described in Section 14184.800.

(10) Employment Supports and BridgeCare, as described in Section 14184.900.

(b) The department shall report to the Legislature any conflicts between this article and the CalAIM Terms and Conditions, including identification of the specific conflicts and recommendations for conforming language.

(c) The department, as appropriate and to the
 extent practicable, shall consult with interested stakeholders with regard to implementation of applicable components of CalAIM under subdivision (a) in which they will participate, including, but not limited to, the issuance of departmental guidance pursuant to subdivision (d). Interested stakeholders may include, but need not be limited to, designated public hospitals, district and municipal public hospitals, other local governmental agencies, consumer representatives, and Medi-Cal managed care plans.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this article or the CalAIM Terms and Conditions, in whole or in part, by means of all-county letters, plan letters, provider bulletins, information notices, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action. The department shall make use of
 appropriate processes to ensure that affected stakeholders are timely informed of, and have access to, applicable guidance issued pursuant to this authority, and that this guidance remains publicly available until all payments related to the applicable CalAIM component are finalized.

(e) For purposes of implementing this article or the CalAIM Terms and Conditions, the department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis, and may implement changes to existing information technology systems. Notwithstanding any other law, contracts entered into or amended, or changes to existing information technology systems, pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, and Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract
 Code, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(f) The department shall seek any federal approvals it deems necessary to implement CalAIM under this article and other provisions of law amended by the act that added this subdivision. This shall include, but need not be limited to, approval of any amendment, addition, or technical correction to the CalAIM Terms and Conditions, as the department deems necessary. This article shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(g) Consistent with subdivision (b), the director shall report to the Legislature on any recommended amendments to any provision, process, or methodology specified in this article, Article 5.4 (commencing with Section 14180),
 Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 14184), or other sections of law amended by the act that added this subdivision, to the extent necessary to comply with federal law or the CalAIM Terms and Conditions, to obtain or maintain federal approval, or to ensure federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized, if the amendment is consistent with the goals set forth in this article and its individual components, and does not significantly alter the relative level of support for participating entities. If the director, after consulting with those entities participating in the applicable CalAIM component and that would be affected by that amendment, determines that the potential amendment would be consistent with the goals set forth in this article and would not significantly alter the relative level of support for affected participating entities, the amendment shall be submitted to the Legislature for its consideration.

(h) During the course of the CalAIM term, the department may develop and implement successor payment methodologies or programs to continue to support entities participating in one or more components of CalAIM following the expiration of the CalAIM term and that further the goals set forth in this article. The department shall consult with the entities participating in the payment methodologies or program components under CalAIM, affected stakeholders, and the Legislature in the development of any successor payment methodologies or program components pursuant to this subdivision.

(i) The department may seek to extend the payment methodologies or programs described in this article, or in the CalAIM Terms and Conditions, including modification thereto, through the CalAIM term or to subsequent time periods by way of amendment or extension of the relevant CalAIM Terms and Conditions, amendment to the Medi-Cal State Plan, or any
 combination thereof, consistent with the applicable federal requirements. This subdivision shall only be implemented after consultation with the entities participating in, or affected by, those methodologies or programs, and only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(j) Notwithstanding any other state or local law, including, but not limited to, Section 5328 of this code, and Sections 11812 and 11845.5 of the Health and Safety Code, the sharing of health, social services, housing, and criminal justice information, records, and other data with and among the department, other state departments, including the State Department of Public Health and the State Department of Social Services, Medi-Cal managed care plans, Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery systems, counties, health care providers, social services organizations, care coordination
 and case management teams, and other authorized provider or plan entities, and contractors of all of those entities, shall be permitted to the extent necessary to implement applicable CalAIM components described in this article and the CalAIM Terms and Conditions, and to the extent consistent with federal law. The department shall issue guidance identifying permissible data-sharing arrangements to implement CalAIM.

(k) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, and to the extent authorized by the CalAIM Terms and Conditions, the department may claim federal financial participation for expenditures associated with the designated state health programs identified in the CalAIM Terms and Conditions for use solely by the department as specified in this subdivision.

(2) Any federal financial participation claimed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be used to offset applicable
 General Fund expenditures. These amounts are hereby appropriated to the department and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund for this purpose.

(3) An amount of General Fund moneys equal to the federal financial participation that may be claimed pursuant to paragraph (1) is hereby appropriated to the Health Care Deposit Fund for use by the department for purposes of implementing this article.

(4) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall maintain reimbursement rates in the Medi-Cal program for primary care, obstetric care, and behavioral health services, and shall increase reimbursement rates for those service codes, as necessary to meet federally imposed minimum requirements specified in the CalAIM Terms and Conditions for dates of service on or after January 1, 2024, to the extent required by the federal Centers for Medicare and
 Medicaid Services as a condition of claiming federal financial participation for designated state health programs as described in this subdivision.

(B) To the extent required by the CalAIM Terms and Conditions, subparagraph (A) shall apply to claims for the identified codes paid by the department in fee-for-service and to claims paid by a Medi-Cal managed care plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 89.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14184.200.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may standardize those populations that are subject to mandatory enrollment in a Medi-Cal managed care plan across all aid code groups and Medi-Cal managed care models statewide, subject to a Medi-Cal managed care plan readiness, continuity of care transition plan, and disenrollment process developed in consultation with stakeholders, in accordance with the CalAIM Terms and Conditions and as described in this section.

(1) (A) The department shall ensure the Medi-Cal managed care plan’s readiness for network adequacy includes a geographic access review of rural ZIP Codes to ensure time or distance standards are met, or alternative access standard requests are approved, as applicable, and the
 plan’s ability to meet existing federal and state mandatory provider type requirements, where available.

(B) The department shall not require a population to enroll in managed care if Medi-Cal managed care plans fail to meet the Medi-Cal managed care plan readiness requirements detailed in this paragraph for that population.

(2) The Medi-Cal managed care plan shall comply with the continuity of care requirements in Section 1373.96 of the Health and Safety Code and shall be consistent with and no more restrictive than existing or future policy and guidance issued by the department, including All Plan Letter 22-032, any superseding all plan letter, and related guidance.

(3) The disenrollment process for an enrollee in any county shall be consistent with and no more restrictive than existing federal and state statutes
 and regulations, including Section 53889 and subdivision (c) of Section 53891 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations. The beneficiary may request a medical exemption from mandatory enrollment in a Medi-Cal managed care plan in accordance with Section 53887 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations and may disenroll or be exempted from mandatory enrollment under the limited circumstances set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 53891 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations. That disenrollment or exemption from mandatory enrollment in a Medi-Cal managed care plan shall be consistent with subsection (c) of Section 438.56 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations and applicable state law.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, if the department standardizes those populations subject to mandatory enrollment in a Medi-Cal managed care plan pursuant to subdivision (a), commencing January 1, 2022,
 and subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102, a non-dual-eligible beneficiary, except a beneficiary identified in paragraph (2), shall be required to enroll, or shall continue to be required to enroll, in a Medi-Cal managed care plan for purposes of their receipt of covered Medi-Cal benefits.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, if the department standardizes those populations subject to mandatory enrollment in a Medi-Cal managed care plan pursuant to subdivision (a), commencing January 1, 2022, or as otherwise specified in this paragraph, subject to subdivision (f) of Section 14184.102, the following dual and non-dual beneficiary groups, as identified by the department, shall be exempt from mandatory enrollment in a Medi-Cal managed care plan:

(A) A beneficiary
 eligible for only restricted-scope Medi-Cal benefits, as described in subdivision (e) of Section 14007.5 and Sections 14005.65 and 14007.7.

(B) A beneficiary made eligible on the basis of a share of cost, including, but not limited to, a non-dual-eligible beneficiary residing in a county that is authorized to operate a county organized health system (COHS), as described in Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5), except for a non-dual-eligible beneficiary that is eligible on the basis of their need for long-term care services with a share of cost, as identified by the department.

(C) A beneficiary made eligible on the basis of a federally approved Medi-Cal Presumptive Eligibility
 program, as determined by the department, but only during the relevant period of presumptive eligibility.

(D) An eligible beneficiary who is an inmate of a public institution, or who is released pursuant to Section 26605.6 or 26605.7 of the Government Code.
